Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 27. Municipal Historical Hamlet Act

§ 17-27-1.
Short title; purpose.

This chapter shall be known as the “Municipal Historical Hamlet Act,” and it shall serve the purpose of having historical small communities organize community activities that will positively influence the infrastructure of such communities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).

§ 17-27-3.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds the following:

Population growth as well as development in historical communities result in new and increased demands for public facilities and services that promote the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare;

The residents and property owners in these communities should have reasonable methods available so they can provide these public facilities and services; and

The ability of residents and property owners in historical communities to propose the establishment of municipal historical hamlets is a method to fulfill the demands for these much needed public facilities and services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).

§ 17-27-5.
Municipal historical hamlet defined; powers.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “municipal historical hamlet” means any former city, town or village with a current population of less than six hundred (600) inhabitants that lost its charter before 1945.

After the creation of a municipal historical hamlet, as prescribed in Sections 17-27-7 through 17-27-11, the powers of such historical hamlet shall be as follows:

To designate the county seat of government located at a county courthouse within the jurisdiction where the hamlet is located as the municipal historical hamlet meeting place;

To be recognized for historical districts within a municipal historical hamlet; and

To work with a planning and development district in promoting economic, community and human resources within a municipal historical hamlet and to apply for any type of grant to improve the infrastructure of such hamlet, including any small municipalities grant programs authorized, such as in Sections 21-17-1 and 21-27-23.

The board of supervisors of the county in which a municipal historical hamlet is located, acting for and on the behalf of the hamlet, may exercise any powers authorized under this section.

Taxes or fees shall not be imposed by or against any municipal historical hamlet for any general or special purpose.

A municipal historical hamlet shall not be considered as one (1) of the classes of municipal corporations which are prescribed in Section 21-1-1 but shall be considered an unincorporated area zoned for consideration of issues affecting the designated community through any application or process recognizing the area specifically within any county or counties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 390, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2011.).

§ 17-27-7.
Petition for creation of municipal historical hamlet; requirements.

Any inhabitant or inhabitants of any former city, town or village that meets the criteria of a municipal historical hamlet, as defined in Section 17-27-5, and desires to create a municipal historical hamlet, shall prepare a petition and file such petition with the chancery clerk of the county in which such proposed historical hamlet is located or, if the proposed municipal historical hamlet is located in more than one (1) county, the chancery clerk of both counties. The petition shall meet the following requirements:

It shall accurately reference the territory proposed to be a municipal historical hamlet as the former municipal corporation and the date on which that charter was suspended, with the last date of such suspension being before 1945;

It shall set forth the name of the hamlet which is desired;

It shall set forth the number of inhabitants of such territory as per the most recent decennial census; and

It shall be sworn to by one or more of the petitioners and placed on file in the land records of the chancery clerk.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).

§ 17-27-9.
Effective date of existence of municipal historical hamlet; prohibition against formation of municipal historical hamlet for certain purposes.

After the filing of the petition for the creation of a municipal historical hamlet, as prescribed in Section 17-27-7, a certified copy of the petition shall be delivered to the president of the board of supervisors in the county or counties where the hamlet is located and shall be spread upon the minutes for recognition as a hamlet, and at that time the existence of the historical hamlet shall become effective.

No municipal historical hamlet shall be recognized that lies in whole or in part in any incorporated area and shall not be considered a municipal corporation under Section 21-1-1 in order to defeat or defend against the inclusion within the boundaries of any municipal corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).

§ 17-27-11.
Form of name of municipal historical hamlet.

The name of a created municipal historical hamlet shall either be “The Municipal Historical Hamlet of_______________,” “The Hamlet of_______________” or “The Historical Hamlet of_______________ .” The blank shall be filled in with the name by which such hamlet has been legally designated and shall be placed in the records of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 380, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2009.).